Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Chapter 17. Transportation Development and Revenue Bond Act.
§ 33.2-1726.
Incidental powers of the Board.

The Board may make and enter into all contracts or agreements necessary or incidental to the execution of its powers under this chapter and may employ engineering, architectural, and construction experts and inspectors, brokers, and such other employees as may be deemed necessary, who shall be paid such compensation as may be provided in accordance with law. All such compensation and all expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this chapter shall be paid solely from funds provided under the authority of this chapter, and no liability or obligation shall be incurred pursuant to this chapter beyond the extent to which money has been provided under the authority of this chapter. The Board may exercise any powers that are necessary or convenient for the execution of its powers under this chapter.

The Board shall maintain and keep in good condition and repair, or cause to be maintained and kept in good condition and repair, the projects authorized under this chapter, when acquired or constructed and opened to traffic, including any project or part thereof that may include portions of existing streets or roads within a county, municipality, or other political subdivision.

The Board is authorized and empowered to establish regulations for the use of any one or more of the projects defined in §

33.2-1700

, as amended, including reasonable regulations relating to (i) maximum and minimum speed limits applicable to motor vehicles using such project, any other provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding; (ii) the types, kinds, and sizes of vehicles that may use such projects; (iii) the nature, size, type of materials, or substances that shall not be transported over such project; and (iv) such other matters as may be necessary or expedient in the interest of public safety with respect to the use of such project, provided that as to the project authorized under the terms of subdivision 5 of the definition of “project” in §

33.2-1700

, the provisions of clauses (i), (ii), (iii), and (iv) shall not apply to existing streets within a municipality and embraced by such project, except as may be otherwise agreed upon by the Board and the municipality.

The projects acquired or constructed under this chapter may be policed in whole or in part by State Police officers even though all or some portions of any such projects lie within the corporate limits of a municipality or other political subdivision. Such officers shall be under the exclusive control and direction of the Superintendent of State Police and shall be responsible for the preservation of public peace, prevention of crime, apprehension of criminals, protection of the rights of persons and property, and enforcement of the laws and regulations of the Commonwealth within the limits of any such projects. All other police officers of the Commonwealth and of each locality or other political subdivision through which any project, or portion thereof, extends shall have the same powers and jurisdiction within the limits of such projects as they have beyond such limits and shall have access to the projects at any time for the purpose of exercising such powers and jurisdiction.

The Board is authorized and empowered to employ and appoint “project guards” for the purpose of protecting the projects and to enforce the regulations of the Board, except those paralleling state law, established for the use of such projects. Such guards may issue summons to appear or arrest on view without warrant and conduct before the nearest officer authorized by law to admit to bail any persons violating, within or upon the projects, any such rule or regulation. The provisions of §§ 46.2-936 and 46.2-940 shall apply mutatis mutandis to the issuance of summons or arrests without warrants pursuant to this section.

The violation of any regulation adopted by the Board pursuant to the authority hereby granted shall be punishable as follows: If such violation would have been a violation of law if committed on any public street or highway in the county, city, or town in which such violation occurred, it shall be punishable in the same manner as if it had been committed on such public road, street, or highway; otherwise it shall be punishable as a Class 1 misdemeanor.

The powers and duties of the Board enumerated in this chapter shall not be construed as a limitation of the general powers or duties of the Board. The Board, in addition to the powers and duties enumerated in this chapter, shall do and perform any and all things and acts necessary in the construction or acquisition, maintenance, and operation of any project to be constructed or acquired under the provisions of this chapter, to the end that such project may become and be operated free of tolls as early as possible and practicable, subject only to the express limitations of this chapter and the limitations of other laws and constitutional provisions applicable thereto.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-252; 1956, c. 158; 1958, c. 583; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-292; 2014, c. 805; 2015, c. 256.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 256 inserted “Class 1” preceding “misdemeanor” at the end of the sixth paragraph.

§ 33.2-1727.
Revenue refunding bonds and revenue bonds for combined purposes.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter and without regard to any other restrictions or limitations contained in this chapter, the Board is authorized to provide by resolution (i) for the issuance of revenue refunding bonds of the Commonwealth for the purpose of refunding any revenue bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter and then outstanding, including interest to the earliest call date of such outstanding bonds and premiums, if any, payable on such call date, and (ii) for the issuance of a single issue of revenue bonds of the Commonwealth for the combined purpose of providing funds (a) to pay the cost of either or both of the projects described in subdivisions 2 and 5 of the definition of “project” in §

33.2-1700

in the event the Board has decided or shall decide to construct either or both of such projects under authority granted in this chapter and (b) to refund revenue bonds of the Commonwealth issued under the provisions of this chapter and then outstanding, including interest to the earliest call date of such outstanding bonds and premiums, if any, payable on such call date. For the purposes of this section, “project,” in relation to the project described in subdivision 5 of the definition of “project” in §

33.2-1700

, includes approach highways thereto and bus facilities for the transportation of passengers through or over the project if the Board deems it advisable to construct such approach highways or acquire such bus facilities, and “cost of the project,” in relation to the projects described in subdivisions 2 and 5 of the definition of “project” in §

33.2-1700

, includes an amount sufficient to reimburse the Board for expenditures or advances made by the Board on account of the cost of either or both of the projects and, in relation to the project described in subdivision 5 of the definition of “project” in § 33.2-1700, includes provision of a sum deemed by the Board to be sufficient for the purpose and includes the cost of constructing approach highways and of providing bus facilities if the Board deems it expedient to construct such approach highways or acquire such facilities as a part of the project described in subdivision 5 of the definition of “project” in § 33.2-1700. In the event bonds are issued for the combined purpose set forth in clause (ii), such amount of the proceeds of such bonds as may be required, together with other funds available for such purpose, for the redemption of the outstanding bonds to be refunded shall be deposited by the Board in trust with the trustee under the trust indenture securing such outstanding bonds for the sole and exclusive purpose of paying and redeeming such bonds, and the balance of such proceeds shall be used solely for the payment of the cost of the project to be constructed.

The issuance of such bonds, the maturities and other details thereof, the rights of the holders thereof, and the duties of the Commonwealth and of the Board in respect to the same shall be governed by the provisions of this chapter as applicable.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-253; 1954, c. 319; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-293; 2013, cc. 585, 646; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1728.
Chapter provides alternative method.

This chapter shall be deemed to provide an additional and alternative method for actions authorized by this chapter and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws and shall not be regarded as in derogation of any existing powers.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-254; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-294; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1729.
Chapter liberally construed.

This chapter, being necessary for the welfare of the Commonwealth and its inhabitants, shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes hereof.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-255; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-295; 2014, c. 805.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

8B M.J. Ferries, § 3.